Illinois, session 104th, HB4206.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Charitable Organization Beneficiary Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Beneficiary designation" means the provision in an 8instrument designating a beneficiary, other than in a will or 9an instrument creating a trust, and may also mean the 10instrument itself, including, but not limited to, any of the 11following: 12        (1) a demand deposit, savings deposit, time deposit or 13    other account or instrument on which the holder is 14    directly liable with a designation for payment upon death 15    or other nonprobate designation making it transferable on 16    death; 17        (2) a security registered in beneficiary form; or 18        (3) a pension, profit-sharing plan, retirement account 19    such as an IRA, 401(k), 403(b), or other 20    employment-related benefit plan. 21    "Beneficiary designation" does not include designation of 22a beneficiary made as part of an annuity or an insurance 23policy.   HB4206 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    "Charitable organization" means an entity that is exempt 2from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 3Code. 4    "Holder of property" means any entity that has possession 5of or is responsible for property subject to a beneficiary 6designation. 7    Section 10. Notice of death of owner of property. If the 8holder of the property has verified the death of the owner of 9the property, the holder of the property must, within 45 10business days of the verification: provide notice to each 11charitable organization listed under the beneficiary 12designation that the charitable organization may have a right 13to the property; provide the charitable organization with the 14name of the owner of the property, contact information of the 15holder of the property; and provide a general description of 16the property held for the benefit of the charitable 17organization; and provide the exact language of the 18beneficiary designation, except that the names of any other 19beneficiaries that are not charitable organizations may be 20redacted. 21    Section 15. Charitable organization affidavit of interest 22in property. 23    (a) If a charitable organization is a beneficiary of an 24interest in property created by beneficiary designation, that   HB4206 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1charitable organization may present an affidavit to the holder 2of the property or to any person with information about the 3property to obtain the property or information regarding the 4property. The affidavit must state all of the following: 5        (1) the decedent's name and last known address to the 6    extent known; 7        (2) a general description of the property to the 8    extent known; 9        (3) the charitable organization's name, address, and 10    primary contact information; 11        (4) the charitable organization is a charitable 12    organization; 13        (5) a request that the property be paid, delivered, or 14    transferred to the charitable organization or that 15    information about the property be given to the charitable 16    organization; 17        (6) the charitable organization has a right to the 18    interest in the property listed in the affidavit to the 19    extent known; 20        (7) the affidavit has been signed by an authorized 21    representative of the charitable organization under 22    penalty of perjury before a notary public as provided in 23    the Notary Public Act; and 24        (8) the information in the affidavit is true and 25    correct to the best of the affiant's knowledge or belief. 26    (b) The affidavit must be accompanied by all of the   HB4206 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1following: 2        (1) a copy of the charitable organization's 3    determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service 4    recognizing its tax-exempt status; 5        (2) a copy of the charitable organization's 6    Certificate of Good Standing issued by the Secretary of 7    State; 8        (3) a death certificate of the decedent, probate 9    notice published by the personal representative of the 10    decedent's estate, proof of payment of the decedent's 11    funeral expenses, the decedent's obituary as verification 12    of the decedent's death, or any other reliable source or 13    record that verifies the decedent's death; 14        (4) a corporate resolution or similar statement of 15    authority of the affiant to act on behalf of the 16    charitable organization; and 17        (5) Internal Revenue Service Form W-9 completed by an 18    authorized representative of the charitable organization. 19    Section 20. Duties of the holder of the property. 20    (a) Unless a court has ordered otherwise, the holder of 21the property may not do any of the following: 22        (1) require the charitable organization to establish 23    an account with the holder of the property or otherwise 24    become a customer of the holder of the property; 25        (2) require co-beneficiaries to submit claims   HB4206 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    simultaneously or impose coordination deadlines among 2    co-beneficiaries; or 3        (3) delay payment to any co-beneficiary if other 4    co-beneficiaries have not submitted their claim 5    documentation, except where a security registered in 6    beneficiary form is not readily divisible among multiple 7    beneficiaries and a co-beneficiary has not waived the 8    co-beneficiary's right to a partial share. In such a case, 9    the holder of the property and the charitable organization 10    shall make reasonable efforts to resolve divisibility 11    concerns. 12    (b) The holder of the property may not request any 13additional personal information from any individual employed 14by or serving on the board of the charitable organization, 15including, but not limited to, any of the following: 16        (1) social security number; 17        (2) personal contact information, including home 18    address; 19        (3) personal financial information; 20        (4) date of birth; 21        (5) annual income; 22        (6) value of personal assets; 23        (7) credit checks; 24        (8) criminal background checks; 25        (9) marital status; 26        (10) number of dependents;   HB4206 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1        (11) spouse's maiden name; or 2        (12) government-issued identification card, such as a 3    passport, state identification card, or driver's license, 4    provided that if an individual delivers or presents an 5    affidavit under Section 15 for the purpose of claiming or 6    receiving property, the holder of the property may request 7    presentation of an unexpired government-issued 8    identification bearing a photograph or similar safeguard 9    solely to verify the identity of the individual presenting 10    the affidavit and the individual's authority to act on 11    behalf of the charitable organization. 12    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits a charitable 13organization from affirmatively requesting the establishment 14of a new account with the holder of the property; only upon 15such affirmative request may the holder of the property 16require the minimum necessary information contained in 17subsection (b) and as required by federal law or regulation 18and the holder's internal account opening policies and 19procedures to facilitate account establishment. 20    (d) If the holder of property maintains it is prohibited 21from paying, delivering, or transferring the property listed 22under a beneficiary designation to a charitable organization 23in compliance with this Act due to requirements under federal 24law, the holder of the property shall: 25        (1) explain in writing the reason why the property 26    cannot be paid, delivered, or transferred to the   HB4206 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    charitable organization; and 2        (2) make good faith efforts in order to facilitate 3    payment, delivery, or transfer of the property in 4    compliance with this Act. 5    (e) Nothing in this Act alters the responsibilities or 6duties of the beneficiary or holder of the property under the 7Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act or the Illinois Trust 8and Payable on Death Accounts Act or federal law or 9regulation. 10    Section 25. Transfer of property. If the requirements of 11this Act are satisfied by a charitable organization, and there 12are no conflicting claims to the same shares or portion of a 13property, the holder of the property must do either or both of 14the following within 60 business days: 15        (1) pay, deliver, or transfer the property to or for 16    the benefit of the charitable organization if the 17    affidavit has requested the transfer, payment, or delivery 18    of the property to the charitable organization, complying 19    with the charitable organization's preference as to 20    whether the property is paid, delivered, or transferred, 21    to the extent that complying with such preference is 22    reasonably practicable for the holder; or 23        (2) deliver the information requested in the affidavit 24    to the charitable organization.   HB4206 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    Section 30. Good faith reliance on information given to 2the holder. The holder of the property and any person who in 3good faith delivers the property or information requested in 4reliance on the information a charitable organization provides 5under this Act, who has no knowledge that representations 6contained in the affidavit are incorrect, is not liable to any 7person for so acting and may assume without inquiry the 8existence of the facts contained in the affidavit. 9    Section 35. Release. Any payments, deliveries, or 10transfers made by the holder of property in compliance with 11this Act prior to the receipt of notice of an adverse claim or 12a restraining order shall be a complete discharge of the 13holder of property's obligations as to the payment, delivery, 14or transfer, and the holder of property shall, to the extent of 15each such payment, delivery, or transfer, be released from all 16claims of any person, charitable organization, or entity 17claiming an interest in the property for such payment, 18delivery, or transfer so made. 19    Section 40. Failure or refusal of holder of the property 20to act. If the holder of the property fails or refuses to 21provide the requested property or information within 60 22business days after receiving the affidavit, the charitable 23organization may bring an action against the holder of the 24property to receive the information about the property or   HB4206 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1recover the property or compel the delivery of the property. 2An action brought under this Act must be brought within one 3year after the date of the act or failure to act. If the court 4finds that the holder of the property acted unreasonably in 5failing to provide the requested information or to pay, 6deliver, or transfer the property in compliance with this Act, 7the court may award to the charitable organization any or all 8of the following: 9        (1) immediate delivery of the requested information or 10    delivery or recovery of the property or value of the 11    property; 12        (2) damages sustained by the charitable organization; 13        (3) costs of the action; 14        (4) a penalty in an amount determined by the court up 15    to $10,000 only if the court finds that the holder of the 16    property engaged in bad faith or willful misconduct; or 17        (5) reasonable attorney's fees based on the time 18    expended by the attorney to obtain the requested 19    information or payment, delivery, or transfer of the 20    property without regard to the amount of the recovery on 21    behalf of the charitable organization. 22    Section 45. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 23changing Section 224 as follows: 24    (215 ILCS 5/224)  (from Ch. 73, par. 836)  HB4206 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    Sec. 224. Standard provisions for life policies. 2    (1) After the first day of July, 1937, no policy of life 3insurance other than industrial, group or annuities and pure 4endowments with or without return of premiums or of premiums 5and interest, may be issued or delivered in this State, unless 6such policy contains in substance the following provisions: 7        (a) A provision that all premiums after the first 8    shall be payable in advance either at the home office of 9    the company or to an agent of the company, upon delivery of 10    a receipt signed by one or more of the officers who shall 11    be designated in the policy, when such receipt is 12    requested by the policyholder. 13        (b) A provision that the insured is entitled to a 14    grace period either of 30 days or of one month within which 15    the payment of any premium after the first may be made, 16    subject at the option of the company to an interest charge 17    not in excess of 6% per annum for the number of days of 18    grace elapsing before the payment of the premium, during 19    which period of grace the policy shall continue in force, 20    but in case the policy becomes a claim during the grace 21    period before the overdue premium is paid, or the deferred 22    premiums of the current policy year, if any, are paid, the 23    amount of such premium or premiums with interest thereon 24    may be deducted in any settlement under the policy. 25        (c) A provision that the policy, together with the 26    application therefor, a copy of which shall be endorsed   HB4206 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    upon or attached to the policy and made a part thereof, 2    shall constitute the entire contract between the parties 3    and that after it has been in force during the lifetime of 4    the insured a specified time, not later than 2 years from 5    its date, it shall be incontestable except for nonpayment 6    of premiums and except at the option of the company, with 7    respect to provisions relative to benefits in the event of 8    total and permanent disability, and provisions which grant 9    additional insurance specifically against death by 10    accident and except for violations of the conditions of 11    the policy relating to naval or military service in time 12    of war or for violation of an express condition, if any, 13    relating to aviation, (except riding as a fare-paying 14    passenger of a commercial air line flying on regularly 15    scheduled routes between definitely established airports) 16    in which case the liability of the company shall be fixed 17    at a definitely determined amount not less than the full 18    reserve for the policy and any dividend additions; 19    provided that the application therefor need not be 20    attached to or made a part of any policy containing a 21    clause making the policy incontestable from date of issue. 22        (d) A provision that if it is found at any time before 23    final settlement under the policy that the age of the 24    insured (or the age of the beneficiary, if considered in 25    determining the premium) has been misstated, the amount 26    payable under the policy shall be such as the premium   HB4206 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    would have purchased at the correct age or ages, according 2    to the company's published rate at date of issue. 3        (e) A provision that the policy shall participate 4    annually in the surplus of the company beginning not later 5    than the end of the third policy year; and any policy 6    containing a provision for annual participation beginning 7    at the end of the first policy year, may also provide that 8    each dividend be paid subject to the payment of the 9    premiums for the next ensuing year; and the insured under 10    any annual dividend policy shall have the right each year 11    to have the dividend arising from such participation 12    either paid in cash, or applied in reduction of premiums, 13    or applied to the purchase of paid-up additional 14    insurance, or be left to accumulate to the credit of the 15    policy, with interest at such rate as may be determined 16    from time to time by the company, but not less than a 17    guaranteed minimum rate specified in the policy, and 18    payable at the maturity of the policy, but withdrawable on 19    any anniversary date, subject to such further provisions 20    as the policy may provide regarding the application of 21    dividends toward the payment of any premiums unpaid at the 22    end of the grace period; and if the insured fails to notify 23    the company in writing of his election within the period 24    of grace allowed for the payment of premium, the policy 25    shall further provide which of such options are effective. 26        (f) A provision that after the policy has been in   HB4206 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    force 3 full years the company at any time, while the 2    policy is in force, will advance, on proper assignment or 3    pledge of the policy and on the sole security thereof, at a 4    specified maximum fixed or adjusted rate of interest in 5    accordance with Section 229.5, a sum equal to, or at the 6    option of the insured less than the amount required by 7    Section 229.3 under the conditions specified thereby and 8    with notification as required by Section 229.5; and that 9    the company will deduct from such loan value any 10    indebtedness not already deducted in determining such 11    value and any unpaid balance of the premium for the 12    current policy year, and may collect interest in advance 13    on the loan to the end of the current policy year; and any 14    policy may also provide that if the interest on the loan is 15    not paid when due it shall be added to the existing loan 16    and shall bear interest at the same rate. No condition 17    other than as provided herein or in Sections 229.3 and 18    229.5 shall be exacted as a prerequisite to any such loan. 19    This clause shall not apply to term insurance. 20        (g) A provision for nonforfeiture benefits and cash 21    surrender values in accordance with the requirements of 22    paragraph (1) of Section 229.1 or, Section 229.2. 23        (h) A table showing in figures the loan values and the 24    options available under the policy each year, upon default 25    in premium payments, during at least the first 20 years of 26    the policy; the policy to contain a provision that the   HB4206 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    company will furnish upon request an extension of such 2    table beyond the years shown in the policy. 3        (i) A provision that in event of default in premium 4    payments the value of the policy is applied to the 5    purchase of other insurance as provided in this Section, 6    and if such insurance is in force and the original policy 7    is not surrendered to the company and cancelled, the 8    policy may be reinstated within 3 years from such default, 9    upon evidence of insurability satisfactory to the company 10    and payment of arrears of premiums and the payment or 11    reinstatement of any other indebtedness to the company 12    upon the policy, with interest on the premiums at a rate 13    not exceeding 6% per annum payable annually and with 14    interest on the indebtedness at a rate not exceeding the 15    rate prescribed by Section 229.5. 16        (j) A provision that when a policy is a claim by the 17    death of the insured settlement shall be made upon receipt 18    of due proof of death and not later than 2 months after the 19    receipt of such proof. The policy may require that due 20    proof of the death of the insured shall consist of a 21    certified copy of the death certificate of the insured, or 22    other lawful evidence providing equivalent information, 23    and proof of the claimant's interest in the proceeds. If 24    due proof of death requires a certified copy of the death 25    certificate, then no more than one beneficiary shall be 26    required to submit a certified copy of the death   HB4206 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1    certificate. 2        (k) If the policy provides for payment of its proceeds 3    in installments, a table showing the amount and period of 4    such installments shall be included in the policy. 5        (l) Interest shall accrue on the proceeds payable 6    because of the death of the insured, from date of death, at 7    the rate of 10% annually on the total amount payable or the 8    face amount if payments are to be made in installments 9    until the total payment or first installment is paid, 10    unless payment is made within 31 days from the latest of 11    the following to occur:12            (1) the date that due proof of death is received by 13        the company;14            (2) the date that the company receives sufficient 15        information to determine its liability, the extent of 16        the liability, and the appropriate payee legally 17        entitled to the proceeds; or18            (3) the date that legal impediments to payment of 19        proceeds that depend on the action of parties other 20        than the company are resolved and sufficient evidence 21        of the same is provided to the company; legal 22        impediments to payment include, but are not limited 23        to, (A) the establishment of guardianships and 24        conservatorships, (B) the appointment and 25        qualification of trustees, executors, and 26        administrators, and (C) the submission of information   HB4206 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1        required to satisfy State and federal reporting 2        requirements. 3    This provision need not appear in the policy, however, the 4    company shall notify the beneficiary at the time of claim 5    of this provision. The payment of interest shall apply to 6    all policies now in force, as well as those written after 7    the effective date of this amendment. 8        (m) Title on the face and on the back of the policy 9    briefly describing its form. 10        (n) A provision, or a notice attached to the policy, 11    to the effect that during a period of ten days from the 12    date the policy is delivered to the policy owner, it may be 13    surrendered to the insurer together with a written request 14    for cancellation of the policy and in such event, the 15    insurer will refund any premium paid therefor, including 16    any policy fees or other charges. The Director may by rule 17    exempt specific types of policies from the requirements of 18    this subsection.19    (2) In the case of the replacement of life insurance, as 20defined in the rule promulgated by the Director, the replacing 21insurer shall either (1) delay the issuance of its policy for 22not less than 20 days from the date it has transmitted a policy 23summary to the existing insurer, or (2) provide in a form 24titled "Notice Regarding Replacement of Life Insurance", as 25well as in its policy, or in a separate notice delivered with 26the policy, that the insured has the right to an unconditional   HB4206 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1refund of all premiums paid, and that such right may be 2exercised within a period of 20 days commencing from the date 3of delivery of such policy. Where option (2) is exercised, the 4replacing insurer shall also transmit a policy summary to the 5existing insurer within 3 working days after the date the 6replacement policy is issued.7    (3) Any of the foregoing provisions or portions thereof 8not applicable to single premium or nonparticipating or term 9policies shall to that extent not be incorporated therein. 10This Section shall not apply to policies of reinsurance nor to 11policies issued or granted pursuant to the nonforfeiture 12provisions prescribed in subparagraph (g) of paragraph (1) of 13this Section.14(Source: P.A. 97-527, eff. 8-23-11.) 15    Section 50. The Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act is 16amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 17    (215 ILCS 185/15)18    Sec. 15. Insurer conduct. 19    (a) An insurer shall initially perform a comparison of its 20insureds', annuitants', and retained asset account holders' 21in-force policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset 22accounts in force on or after January 1, 2017 by using the full 23Death Master File. The initial comparison shall be completed 24on or before December 31, 2017. An insurer required to perform   HB4206 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1a comparison of its insureds', annuitants', and retained asset 2account holders' in-force policies, annuity contracts, and 3retained asset accounts in force on or after January 1, 2012 4shall perform a comparison of policies, annuity contracts, and 5retained asset accounts in force between January 1, 2012 and 6December 31, 2016 on or before December 31, 2018 by using the 7full Death Master File. An insurer required to perform a 8comparison of electronic searchable files concerning its 9insureds', annuitants', and retained asset account holders' 10in-force policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset 11accounts in force on or after January 1, 2000 shall perform a 12comparison of policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset 13accounts in force between January 1, 2000 and December 31, 142016 on or before December 31, 2018 by using the full Death 15Master File. Thereafter, an insurer shall perform a comparison 16on at least a semi-annual basis using the Death Master File 17update files for comparisons to identify potential matches of 18its insureds, annuitants, and retained asset account holders. 19In the event that one of the insurer's lines of business 20conducts a search for matches of its insureds, annuitants, and 21retained asset account holders against the Death Master File 22at intervals more frequently than semi-annually, then all 23lines of the insurer's business shall conduct searches for 24matches against the Death Master File with the same frequency. 25Within 6 months after acquisition of policies, annuity 26contracts, or retained asset accounts from another insurer,   HB4206 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1the acquiring insurer shall compare all newly acquired 2policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset accounts that 3were not searched by the previous insurer in compliance with 4this Act against the complete Death Master File to identify 5potential matches of its insureds, annuitants, and retained 6asset account holders. Upon any subsequent acquisition of 7policies, annuity contracts, or retained asset accounts from 8another insurer, when the previous insurer has already 9conducted a search of the newly acquired policies, annuity 10contracts, and retained asset accounts using the complete 11Death Master File, the acquiring insurer shall compare all 12newly acquired policies, annuity contracts, and retained asset 13accounts using all of the Death Master File updates since the 14time the previous insurer conducted the complete search to 15identify potential matches of its insureds, annuitants, and 16retained asset account holders. 17    An insured, an annuitant, or a retained asset account 18holder is presumed dead if the date of his or her death is 19indicated by the comparison required in this subsection (a), 20unless the insurer has competent and substantial evidence that 21the person is living, including, but not limited to, a contact 22made by the insurer with the person or his or her legal 23representative.24    For those potential matches identified as a result of a 25Death Master File match, the insurer shall within 120 days 26after the date of death notice, if the insurer has not been   HB4206 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1contacted by a beneficiary, determine whether benefits are due 2in accordance with the applicable policy or contract and, if 3benefits are due in accordance with the applicable policy or 4contract:5        (1) use good faith efforts, which shall be documented 6    by the insurer, to locate the beneficiary or 7    beneficiaries; the Department shall establish by 8    administrative rule minimum standards for what constitutes 9    good faith efforts to locate a beneficiary, which shall 10    include: (A) searching insurer records; (B) the 11    appropriate use of First Class United States mail, e-mail 12    addresses, and telephone calls; and (C) reasonable efforts 13    by insurers to obtain updated contact information for the 14    beneficiary or beneficiaries; good faith efforts shall not 15    include additional attempts to contact the beneficiary at 16    an address already confirmed not to be current; 17        If the beneficiary is a charitable organization as 18    defined in Section 5 of the Charitable Organization 19    Beneficiary Act, but excluding not-for-profit 20    organizations that are the irrevocable sole beneficiary of 21    a life insurance policy covered by Section 245.2 of the 22    Illinois Insurance Code, the insurer shall, within 120 23    days, including if the insurer has been contacted by the 24    charitable beneficiary: 25            (A) determine whether the charitable organization 26        has a right to the proceeds of the policy, annuity   HB4206 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1        contract, or a retained asset account; 2            (B) provide a general description of the policy, 3        annuity contract, or a retained asset account that may 4        be held for the benefit of the charitable 5        organization, and the exact language of the 6        beneficiary designation, in accordance with subsection 7        (c); 8            (C) include information that verifies whether the 9        insurer has already obtained the official death 10        certificate or documentation needed to verify the 11        death of the insured, annuitant, or retained asset 12        account holder; and13        (2) provide the appropriate claims forms or 14    instructions to the beneficiary or beneficiaries to make a 15    claim, including the need to provide an official death 16    certificate if applicable under the policy or annuity 17    contract.18        If the beneficiary is a charitable organization as 19    defined in Section 5 of the Charitable Organization 20    Beneficiary Act, the insurer shall, within 120 days, 21    provide the forms and instructions pursuant to subsection 22    (a)(2), and the insurer has the same duties as a holder of 23    property under Section 20 of the Charitable Organization 24    Beneficiary Act, including if the insurer has been 25    contacted by the charitable beneficiary. 26    (b) Insurers shall implement procedures to account for the   HB4206 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1following when conducting searches of the Death Master File:2        (1) common nicknames, initials used in lieu of a first 3    or middle name, use of a middle name, compound first and 4    middle names, and interchanged first and middle names;5        (2) compound last names, maiden or married names, and 6    hyphens, blank spaces, or apostrophes in last names;7        (3) transposition of the "month" and "date" portions 8    of the date of birth; and9        (4) incomplete social security numbers.10    (c) To the extent permitted by law, an insurer may 11disclose the minimum necessary personal information about the 12insured, annuity owner, retained asset account holder, or 13beneficiary to a person whom the insurer reasonably believes 14may be able to assist the insurer with locating the 15beneficiary or a person otherwise entitled to payment of the 16claims proceeds.17    (d) An insurer or its service provider shall not charge 18any beneficiary or other authorized representative for any 19fees or costs associated with a Death Master File search or 20verification of a Death Master File match conducted pursuant 21to this Act.22    (e) The benefits from a policy, annuity contract, or a 23retained asset account, plus any applicable accrued interest, 24shall first be payable to the designated beneficiaries or 25owners and, in the event the beneficiaries or owners cannot be 26found, shall be reported and delivered to the State Treasurer   HB4206 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 16254 JRC 29638 b1pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 2Nothing in this subsection (e) is intended to alter the 3amounts reportable under the existing provisions of the 4Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act or to allow the 5imposition of additional statutory interest under Article XIV 6of the Illinois Insurance Code.7    (f) Failure to meet any requirement of this Section with 8such frequency as to constitute a general business practice is 9a violation of Section 424 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 10Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create or imply a 11private cause of action for a violation of this Section.12(Source: P.A. 99-893, eff. 1-1-17; 100-22, eff. 1-1-18; 13100-543, eff. 1-1-18; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.)